Utah statutes.
58-41-16.   Privileged communication.

A person licensed under this chapter may not be examined or required to reveal any findings, examinations, or representation made by his client to him, or any advice or treatment given to his client in the course of professional practice, without the consent of his client or the client's representative.  A person employed by a person licensed  under this chapter may not be examined without the consent of the employer concerning any fact of which the employee has acquired knowledge in his professional capacity.

